Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 5 Miscellaneous Provisions
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, examination questions, answer sheets, scoring keys, and other examination data used for the purpose of licensure, certification, or registration of health professionals under title 63 or title 68 shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for inspection by members of the public; provided, however, that:

A person who has taken such an examination has the right to review the person's own completed examination; and

Final examination scores of persons licensed, certified, or registered as health professionals under title 63 or title 68 shall be open for inspection by members of the public, upon request.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, information that is reasonably likely to identify a student accused of committing an alleged sexual offense or alleged violent sexual offense as defined in § 40-39-202 or any information that is reasonably likely to identify the victim of an alleged sexual offense or alleged violent sexual offense as defined in § 40-39-202, must be treated as confidential and not be open for inspection by members of the public.

Nothing in this subsection (w):

Limits or denies access to otherwise public information because a file, document, or data file contains information that is reasonably likely to identify a student accused of committing a sexual offense or violent sexual offense or the victim of a sexual offense or violent sexual offense; however, all information that is reasonably likely to identify a student accused of committing a sexual offense or violent sexual offense, or the victim of a sexual offense or violent sexual offense must be redacted before any access is granted to a member of the public for inspection;

Prevents the district attorney general, the attorney general and reporter, or counsel for a defendant from providing to each other in a pending criminal case or appeal, where the constitutional rights of the defendant require it, information that otherwise may be held confidential under this subsection (w); or

Limits access to records by law enforcement agencies, courts, or other governmental agencies or instrumentalities performing official functions.

[Effective until July 1, 2026.]

The following information regarding donors to the state museum is confidential and not open for inspection by members of the public, upon the donor's advance request; provided, however, that the museum may disclose such information as authorized or required by law:

Residential information, including the street address, city, state, and zip code;

Home telephone and personal cell phone numbers;

Social security number;

Electronic mail address; and

Taxpayer identification number.

This subsection (x) is repealed effective July 1, 2026.

The head of a governmental entity may promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to maintain the confidentiality of records concerning adoption proceedings or records required to be kept confidential by federal statute or regulation as a condition for the receipt of federal funds or for participation in a federally funded program.

All contingency plans of law enforcement agencies prepared to respond to any violent incident, bomb threat, ongoing act of violence at a school or business, ongoing act of violence at a place of public gathering, threat involving a weapon of mass destruction, or terrorist incident are not open for inspection as provided in § 10-7-503(a).

Acts 1957, ch. 285, § 2; 1970, ch. 531, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 99, § 1; 1975, ch. 127, § 1; 1976, ch. 552, § 1; 1976, ch. 777, § 1; 1977, ch. 152, § 3; 1978, ch. 544, § 1; 1978, ch. 890, § 2; T.C.A., § 15-305; Acts 1983, ch. 211, § 1; 1984, ch. 947, § 2; 1985, ch. 421, §§ 1-4; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 29; 1987, ch. 118, § 2; 1987, ch. 337, § 20; 1988, ch. 783, § 1; 1988, ch. 894, § 2; 1989, ch. 75, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 27; 1990, ch. 888, § 1; 1991, ch. 129, § 1; 1992, ch. 823, § 1; 1996, ch. 724, § 1; 1996, ch. 745, § 16; 1996, ch. 1079, § 29; 1997, ch. 84, § 1; 1997, ch. 290, § 1; 1997, ch. 292, § 1; 1998, ch. 1075, § 1; 1999, ch. 176, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 199, § 1; 1999, ch. 344, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1999, ch. 514, § 2; 2000, ch. 562, § 1; 2000, ch. 783, § 10; 2001, ch. 259, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 730, § 53; 2002, ch. 769, § 1; 2002, ch. 819, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 12; 2003, ch. 105, § 1; 2003, ch. 201, § 1; 2003, ch. 295, § 1; 2004, ch. 434, § 1; 2004, ch. 673, § 21; 2005, ch. 47, § 1; 2005, ch. 474, § 6; 2006, ch. 665, § 1; 2007, ch. 178, § 1; 2007, ch. 425, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 853, §§ 1-3; 2008, ch. 1011, § 3; 2009, ch. 176, § 1; 2009, ch. 310, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 328, § 1; 2009, ch. 358, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 5; 2009, ch. 567, § 1; 2010, ch. 710, § 1; 2011, ch. 151, § 3; 2011, ch. 158, § 6; 2012, ch. 577, § 1; 2012, ch. 648, § 1; 2012, ch. 798, § 5; 2012, ch. 811, § 1; 2012, ch. 848, § 6; 2012, ch. 877, § 1; 2012, ch. 1082, § 1; 2013, ch. 15, § 1; 2013, ch. 229, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 284, § 1; 2013, ch. 314, § 1; 2014, ch. 569, § 1; 2014, ch. 717, § 1; 2014, ch. 804, § 1; 2014, ch. 841, §§ 1-3; 2015, ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 169, § 1; 2015, ch. 181, § 1; 2015, ch. 211, § 2; 2015, ch. 217, § 1; 2015, ch. 415, § 1; 2015, ch. 511, § 6; 2016, ch. 618, § 1; 2016, ch. 686, § 1; 2016, ch. 722, § 5; 2016, ch. 1009, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 30, 31; 2017, ch. 113, § 1; 2017, ch. 114, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 192, § 8; 2017, ch. 240, § 1; 2017, ch. 255, § 1; 2017, ch. 296, § 1; 2017, ch. 308, § 1; 2018, ch. 613, §§ 2, 3; 2018, ch. 633, § 1; 2018, ch. 676, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 939, § 1; 2018, ch. 980, § 3; 2018, ch. 1060, § 1; 2019, ch. 81, § 2; 2019, ch. 111, § 1; 2019, ch. 479, § 1; 2020, ch. 624, § 1; 2020, ch. 676, §§ 4, 5; 2020, ch. 735, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (o) was redesignated as subdivision (n)(2)(A) by the code commission in 2012.

Acts 2014, ch. 804, § 1 purported to enact a new subsection (p) to this section. However, Acts 2014, ch. 717, § 1 previously enacted subsection (p); therefore, the code commission has designated the subsection enacted by Acts 2014, ch. 804, § 1 as subsection (q).

Acts 2016, ch. 722, § 5 purported to enact a new subdivision (a)(28). However, Acts 2016, ch. 686, § 1 previously enacted subdivision (a)(28); therefore, the code commission has designated the subdivision enacted by Acts 2016, ch. 722, § 1 as subdivision (a)(29).

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 769, § 2 provided that the addition of (a)(16)(I) shall apply to all orders of protection filed on or after July 1, 2002.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that:

“To effectuate the provisions of this act, the Commissioner of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to § 4-5-209 (now § 4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.”

Former §§ 40-39-103 and 40-39-106, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 921, § 4, effective August 1, 2004.

Acts 2008, ch. 1011, § 4 provided that the state board of education, acting in consultation with the department of children's services, is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added subdivision (a)(4)(G). The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in subdivision (j)(1), are deemed references to the board of parole.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 841 took effect on April 28, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 511, § 10 provided that the commissioner of revenue, the commissioner of safety, and the commissioner of commerce and insurance are authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2017, ch. 255, § 2 provided that the act, which added subsection (u), shall expire on July 1, 2022.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Student Due Process Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 14 provided that public institutions of higher education may implement this part by promulgating emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Title 4, Chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 980, § 15 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all contested cases that are requested on or after July 1, 2018.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment by ch. 624, substituted “subdivision (a)(20)” for “subsection (a)” and “this subdivision (a)(20) only” for “this section only” throughout (a)(20).

The 2020 amendment by ch. 676, added (y) and (z).

The 2020 amendment by ch. 735 added (t)(3)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 624, § 2. March 25, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 676, § 6, June 15, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 735, § 2. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Access permitted for reports of harm and granting of access in cases of abuse, § 33-3-108.

Access, retention or disposal of confidential or archival records, § 10-7-508.

Access to records of additional information required by comptroller of the treasury, § 67-5-1319.

Accident reports, § 55-12-104.

Accident reports, confidentiality, § 55-10-114.

Adoption records, § 36-1-125.

Adult Protection Act, confidentiality, § 71-6-118.

Agency documents and records, deletion of confidential portions, § 4-5-218.

Agent for student athletes, registration as public record, §§ 49-7-2105, 49-7-2106.

Agreement as to liability and damages between merchant and employee committing theft of merchandise, § 39-14-145.

Agreements regarding the nondisclosure of trade secrets or other confidential commercial by the division, § 65-4-118.

Aid to families with dependent children, confidentiality, § 71-3-119.

Annual estimates of teacher effects on student progress in grades three through eight (3-8), § 49-1-606.

Annual reports by deferred presentment services licensees, § 45-17-119.

Appeal procedure for state employees, § 8-30-318.

Assessment by comptroller of the treasury, § 67-5-1301.

Atomic energy and nuclear materials, confidentiality of proprietary information, § 68-202-217.

Attorney-client communications protected from commissioner of taxation investigation, § 67-1-1710.

Attorney-client privilege, § 23-3-105.

Attorney-private detective privilege, § 24-1-209.

Audit information provided by TNInvestcos, § 4-28-110.

Authorization of employee to carry concealed weapon on school property in distressed rural county, § 49-6-816.

Availability for inspection of government records kept on computer or removable computer storage media, § 10-7-121.

Availability of records to adopted persons finalized or attempted prior to March 16, 1951, § 36-1-127.

Banks and financial institutions, records, §§ 45-2-1603, 45-2-1713, 45-7-216, 45-7-225.

Banks, change of control, confidentiality of commissioner of financial institutions' information, § 45-2-103.

Bidding, contracts and purchases generally, title 12, ch. 3, part 2.

Board of dentistry, § 63-5-104.

Board of veterinary medical examiners, confidentiality, § 63-12-110.

Breach of confidentiality of grand jury proceedings—Penalty, § 40-12-211.

Cafeteria benefit plans, government employees, confidentiality of medical records, § 8-25-502.

Cafeteria compensation plan services for state employees, confidentiality of medical records, § 8-25-502.

Campaign finance, disclosure of contract for consulting services to Tennessee ethics commission, § 2-10-125.

Campaign finance, disclosure of fees, commissions, etc. for consulting services to Tennessee ethics commission, § 2-10-126.

Cancer reporting system, title 68, ch. 1, part 10.

Captive insurance companies, audits, § 56-13-109.

Centralized record system for sexual offenders, confidentiality of certain registration information, public information regarding offenders, § 40-39-206.

Chancery court records and papers, insurance company delinquency proceedings, § 56-9-201.

Changes affecting bank control, § 45-2-103.

Child abuse, confidentiality of reports of harm and identity of reporter, § 37-1-409.

Child advocacy centers, § 9-4-213.

Child custody determinations under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, confidentiality of records, § 36-6-224.

Child sexual abuse, confidentiality of records, § 37-1-612.

Citations based on unmanned traffic enforcement cameras, § 55-8-198.

Claim for health care liability, § 29-26-121.

Claims against state, confidentiality of records, § 9-8-307.

Clergy — Communications, § 24-1-206.

Closed meeting by association that regulates interscholastic athletics where confidential information protected by privacy law or privilege discussed, § 49-2-132.

Commissioner of commerce and insurance, records and proceedings relating to supervision of insurers, § 56-9-504.

Commissioner of correction, restricting access to records, § 4-6-140.

Commissioner of revenue, confidentiality of inheritance tax records, § 67-8-404.

Commissioner of revenue, confidentiality of transfer tax records, § 67-8-109.

Communications between psychiatrist and patient, confidentiality, § 24-1-207.

Communications during crisis intervention, § 24-1-204.

Community health management information systems, § 63-6-228.

Complaints of judicial disability, confidentiality, § 17-5-303.

Compliance review documents, confidentiality in department of financial institutions, § 45-1-126.

Confidential communications between husband and wife, § 24-1-201.

Confidential data or records of students enrolled in TICUA institutions, § 49-7-216.

Confidential documents and communications of victim-offender mediation center, § 16-20-103.

Confidential information in competitive bidding, § 7-54-107.

Confidential matters excluded from prohibition on infringing on a governmental entity member's freedom of speech, § 4-29-123.

“Confidential public record” defined, § 10-7-301.

Confidential records of city whose primary industry is tourism, § 6-54-204.

Confidential registry of persons and categories of persons who are ineligible to place a wager in this state, § 4-51-312.

Confidential reporting of illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity in higher education, § 49-14-103.

Confidential reporting of illegal, improper, wasteful or fraudulent activity under State of Tennessee Audit Committee Act of 2005, § 4-35-107.

Confidential reporting of suspected illegal, improper, wasteful or fraudulent activity, § 9-3-406.

Confidentiality by medication aides, § 63-7-127.

Confidentiality, disclosure of information, in controlled substance monitoring, § 53-10-306.

Confidentiality in reporting incidents of abuse, neglect and misappropriation in a health care facility, § 68-11-211.

Confidentiality of abortion records and reports, § 39-15-203.

Confidentiality of accident investigation, § 55-10-108.

Confidentiality of accident reports, § 55-10-114.

Confidentiality of accountant employment information, § 62-1-116.

Confidentiality of accountant peer review, § 62-1-201.

Confidentiality of activities of peer review committees of pharmacists, § 63-10-401.

Confidentiality of activities of screening panels regarding health practitioners, § 63-1-138.

Confidentiality of activities of screening panels regarding suspension, revocation, or denial of a certificate of a health practitioner, § 63-4-115.

Confidentiality of activities of screening panels regarding suspension, revocation, or denial of a certificate of a nurse, § 63-7-115.

Confidentiality of actuarial opinion, § 56-1-420.

Confidentiality of address of child and non-perpetrating parent in case of child abuse in mediation proceeding, § 36-6-107.

Confidentiality of adoption or federal records, § 10-7-503.

Confidentiality of affidavit concerning judicial disability, § 17-5-307.

Confidentiality of AIDS testing, § 68-11-222.

Confidentiality of annual summary of notifications by comptroller, § 8-4-407.

Confidentiality of application and materials submitted with application for position of chief executive officer of public institution of higher education — Records of finalists, § 49-7-154.

Confidentiality of application to investigate or prosecute judge, § 8-6-112.

Confidentiality of audit and investigatory information of ethics commission, § 3-6-308.

Confidentiality of audit of candidate or candidate’s committee, § 2-10-212.

Confidentiality of information in reports of sales of of beer, tobacco products, or

other types of tangible personal property, § 67-6-410.

Confidentiality of information provided to LEA threat assessment team, § 49-6-2702.

Confidentially of audit report of licensed fantasy sports operator, § 47-18-1604.

Confidentiality of audit reports, § 8-4-116.

Confidentiality of the college savings trust fund program board of trustees records, §§ 49-7-804, 49-7-825.

Confidentiality of background checks of appointees, § 38-6-106.

Confidentiality of bank and financial institution information, §§ 45-2-1603, 45-2-1713, 45-7-216.

Confidentiality of cancer reporting system information, §§ 68-1-1006, 68-1-1007.

Confidentiality of chemical and physical properties of coal, § 59-8-406.

Confidentiality of claims data on inpatient and outpatient discharges, § 68-1-108.

Confidentiality of coal mine inspections, § 59-8-413.

Confidentiality of collection services information, § 62-20-119.

Confidentiality of communications between client and registered nurse, § 63-7-125.

Confidentiality of communications between psychological professional and client, § 63-11-213.

Confidentiality of communications pertaining to domestic abuse death, § 36-3-624.

Confidentiality of community-based program notices, § 40-36-302.

Confidentiality of complaint investigations regarding office-based surgeries, § 63-6-221.

Confidentiality of complaint investigations regarding office-based surgeries by osteopathic physicians, § 63-9-117.

Confidentiality of complaint regarding judicial disability, § 17-5-303.

Confidentiality of conference between victim and prosecuting attorney, § 40-38-114.

Confidentiality of consent to abortion, § 39-15-202.

Confidentiality of contractors' financial statements, § 62-6-124.

Confidentiality of contracts for professional contract of unarmed combat, § 68-115-214.

Confidentiality of court files and records in proceedings involving juveniles, § 37-1-153.

Confidentiality of court of the judiciary proceedings, Tenn. R. Ct. of Judiciary 8.

Confidentiality of court reports related to surrender, § 36-1-111.

Confidentiality of criminal history records information gathered as a condition of employment with the department of financial institutions, § 45-1-117.

Confidentiality of data aiding enforcement of quality care standards for nursing homes, § 68-11-909.

Confidentiality of department of human services, § 71-1-131.

Confidentiality of disclosure information by mortgagee, §§ 47-23-101, 47-23-102.

Confidentiality of disclosure of lists of petroleum products and alternative fuels licensees, § 67-3-911.

Confidentiality of drug testing information, § 41-1-121.

Confidentiality of drug testing program for TANF applicants, § 71-3-1204.

Confidentiality of education records, 49-10-601.

Confidentiality of electronic surveillance, § 40-6-304.

Confidentiality of examination, audit, or investigation conducted with regard to reserve or special fund, § 29-20-401.

Confidentiality of financial information, § 45-2-1717.

Confidentiality of fingerprinting and photographs in proceedings involving juveniles, § 37-1-155.

Confidentiality of grand jury proceedings and documents, §§ 40-12-209, 40-12-210.

Confidentiality of health insurance issuer and group health plan claims information contained in all payer claims database, § 56-2-125.

Confidentiality of HIV testing of pregnant women, § 68-5-703.

Confidentiality of identifying information in birth defects registry, § 68-5-506.

Confidentiality of identifying information received by the Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges, § 37-1-506.

Confidentiality of identifying information relating to recipients of child abuse prevention services, § 71-6-203.

Confidentiality of identity of infant, mother, or other parent in case of infant surrender, § 68-11-255.

Confidentiality of individual student records under scholarship and grant programs, § 49-4-903.

Confidentiality of information about persons to whom services are provided by poison control, § 68-141-105.

Confidentiality of information collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety by circuit and criminal courts, § 16-10-213.

Confidentiality of information collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety by chancery courts, § 16-11-206.

Confidentiality of information collected and reported to the federal bureau of investigation-NICS Index and the department of safety by county and probate courts, § 16-16-120.

Confidentiality of information collected by judicial evaluation commission, § 17-4-201.

Confidentiality of information concerning employee’s medical diagnosis, treatment or referral with regard to cafeteria plan services, § 8-25-502.

Confidentiality of information contained in advance notice registry, § 36-1-304.

Confidentiality of information entered by candidate or campaign committee into electronic filing system, § 2-10-211.

Confidentiality of information entrusted to pharmacist, § 63-10-212.

Confidentiality of information gathered during an investigation into abuse, neglect, or sexual abuse, § 37-5-512.

Confidentiality of information gathered during investigations by child protective teams, § 37-1-607.

Confidentiality of information gathered in investigation of prospective kinship foster care parent, § 37-2-414.

Confidentiality of information in cases of suspected arson, § 68-102-115.

Confidentiality of information in expunged criminal offender and pretrial diversion database, § 38-6-118.

Confidentiality of information in real estate transaction, § 62-13-403.

Confidentiality of information in trauma registry, § 68-11-259.

Confidentiality of information on application for absentee ballot by armed forces personnel, § 2-6-502.

Confidentiality of information or records, Interstate compact for supervision of adult offenders, § 40-28-401.

Confidentiality of information provided for determining nexus to state for sales and use tax purposes, § 67-6-515.

Confidentiality of information provided to pharmacy peer review committee, § 63-10-405.

Confidentiality of information regarding applicants for athletic competitions, § 68-115-207.

Confidentiality of information regarding deceased inmates infected by bloodborne pathogens, § 41-51-103.

Confidentiality of information regarding drug or alcohol treatment of dentist or dental assistant, § 63-5-124.

Confidentiality of information regarding hazardous waste management, § 68-212-109.

Confidentiality of information regarding impaired health practitioners, § 63-1-136.

Confidentiality of information related to a minor’s abortion, § 37-10-304.

Confidentiality of information related to physical or mental health of patient, § 56-7-124.

Confidentiality of information related to student drug overdoses, § 68-24-301.

Confidentiality of information relating to candidates for position of museum director, § 4-12-113.

Confidentiality of information, reports, and proceedings in cases of abuse or neglect, § 71-6-118.

Confidentiality of information submitted by improvement care trust fund, § 46-1-218.

Confidentiality of information supplied in applying for licensure as a soil scientist, § 62-18-213.

Confidentiality of information under Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act, § 62-43-104.

Confidentiality of inmate records, § 4-6-140.

Confidentiality of investigation into violation of election laws, § 2-11-202.

Confidentiality of investigative records of TennCare bureau, § 71-5-2516.

Confidentiality of juvenile court predisposition report, Tenn. R. Juv. P. 33.

Confidentiality of laboratory report on serological test, § 68-5-604.

Confidentiality of legislative computer system information, § 3-10-108.

Confidentiality of library records, title 10, ch. 8.

Confidentiality of litter reports, § 54-1-403.

Confidentiality of marital and family therapist communications with client, § 63-22-114.

Confidentiality of marketing strategies and strategic plans, § 68-11-238.

Confidentiality of matters before TennCare advisory commission, § 71-5-143.

Confidentiality of mediation participants, § 16-20-103.

Confidentiality of mediation proceedings between parties to divorce, § 36-4-130.

Confidentiality of medical misconduct information, § 63-1-117.

Confidentiality of medical record information with regard to national nosocomial infection surveillance/national healthcare safety network, § 68-11-263.

Confidentiality of medical records compiled by retirement system, § 8-36-510.

Confidentiality of medical records maintained by the Tennessee claims commission, § 9-8-311.

Confidentiality of medical records maintained by the department of treasury’s division of claims and risk management, § 9-8-408.

Confidentiality of medical records provided to the bureau of workers' compensation in the course of its activities and the review of settlements, § 50-6-131.

Confidentiality of medical records submitted in regard to deferred compensation plan services, § 8-25-109.

Confidentiality of medical records submitted in regard to profit sharing and/or salary production plan services, § 8-25-307.

Confidentiality of medical records submitted to, or compiled by, the retirement system, § 8-36-510.

Confidentiality of meetings of TennCare foundation, § 71-5-107.

Confidentiality of memorandum of actuarial opinion of reserves, § 56-1-903.

Confidentiality of mental health records, §§ 33-3-103, 33-3-104, 33-3-111, 33-3-112, 33-3-113, 33-3-114.

Confidentiality of mentally ill patient records, § 33-3-104.

Confidentiality of military discharge record, § 8-13-118.

Confidentiality of mining permit application, § 59-8-411.

Confidentiality of motor vehicle records and personal information retained by department of safety and department of revenue, § 55-25-107.

Confidentiality of name and other personally identifiable information of each correction officer in annual corrections officer retention report, § 41-1-127.

Confidentiality of name of owner or operator of trade or business on license or application, § 67-4-722.

Confidentiality of nonpublic executive sessions, § 9-3-405.

Confidentiality of nursing home complainant’s identity, § 68-11-904.

Confidentiality of personal information used in annual report on foster care, § 37-2-411.

Confidentiality of pharmaceutical information contained in records of TennCare bureau or state of Tennessee, § 71-5-197.

Confidentiality of plans and reports related to Tennessee Hazardous Waste Reduction Act of 1990, § 68-212-311.

Confidentiality of polygraph examiner information, § 62-27-124.

Confidentiality of presentence investigation reports, § 40-35-205.

Confidentiality of procurement documents and contracts filed with the lottery procurement panel, § 4-51-126.

Confidentiality of proprietary information contained in a permit application or in other documents received by the local government, § 65-17-108.

Confidentiality of proprietary information of emergency communications board, § 7-86-317.

Confidentiality of proprietary information provided to Tennessee department of commerce and insurance or TennCare bureau, § 71-5-142.

Confidentiality of proprietary information related to environmental protection, § 68-202-217.

Confidentiality of public records, § 9-8-311.

Confidentiality of public records, § 9-8-408.

Confidentiality of public records, § 56-13-404.

Confidentiality of public records, § 56-12-211.

Confidentiality of rail fixed guideway public transportation system safety plan, § 13-10-204.

Confidentiality of records and information relating to known or suspected cases of STDs, § 68-10-113.

Confidentiality of records and proceedings of accountant review committees § 62-1-202.

Confidentiality of records and proceedings of peer review committees, § 63-11-220.

Confidentiality of records and proceedings of veterinarian peer review committees, § 63-12-138.

Confidentiality of records containing the amount of funds reserved for each claim for the risk management fund, § 9-8-307.

Confidentiality of records identifying child or family receiving services of the department of children’s services, §§ 37-5-105, 37-5-107.

Confidentiality of records in investigating reports of abuse or neglect, § 71-6-103.

Confidentiality of records of department of human services concerning the provision of Title IV-D spousal or child support services, § 71-1-131.

Confidentiality of records of division of geology and former Tennessee state park and forestry commission, § 11-1-102.

Confidentiality of records of gifts to higher institutions, § 49-7-140.

Confidentiality of records of medical or research practitioner, § 53-11-408.

Confidentiality of records of post mortem examinations and examinations of medical examiner, § 38-7-110.

Confidentiality of records of proceedings of department of commerce and insurance regarding geologist applicants, § 62-36-115.

Confidentiality of records of reports of child sexual abuse, § 37-1-612.

Confidentiality of records of shelters or centers, § 36-3-623.

Confidentiality of records of Tennessee technology development corporation, § 4-14-308.

Confidentiality of records of veterinary medical examiners board, § 63-12-110.

Confidentiality of records, proceedings, and communications of lawyer assistance programs, § 23-4-105.

Confidentiality of records, state board of education, § 49-1-302.

Confidentiality of records under the Fair Disclosure of State Funded Payments for Pharmacists' Services Act. § 56-7-3112.

Confidentiality of registration and records of drug and alcohol treatment facilities, § 33-10-408.

Confidentiality of registration information in centralized record system, § 40-39-206.

Confidentiality of registration of public obligations, owner's identity, § 9-19-109.

Confidentiality of reporter's news source, § 24-1-208.

Confidentiality of reports and plans of foster care review board, § 37-2-408.

Confidentiality of reports by title pledge lenders, § 45-15-109.

Confidentiality of reports of cruelty, abuse, or neglect, § 38-1-402.

Confidentiality of reports of harm and identity of reporter in case of mandatory child abuse reports, § 37-1-409.

Confidentiality of reports of qualified public depositories, § 9-4-518.

Confidentiality of reports of violence within correctional facilities, § 41-21-408.

Confidentiality of reports where adoption proceedings are dismissed, § 36-1-118.

Confidentiality of required workplace drug or alcohol tests, § 50-9-106.

Confidentiality of research records and materials, § 49-7-120.

Confidentiality of results of any inmate's test for infectious diseases, § 41-51-103.

Confidentiality of savings and loan association information, §§ 45-3-807, 45-3-814, 45-3-1308.

Confidentiality of savings and loan association records, § 45-3-807.

Confidentiality of school building-level emergency response safety plans, § 49-6-808.

Confidentiality of social security number on voter registration form, § 2-2-142.

Confidentiality of sources of body parts for transplantation, § 68-30-111.

Confidentiality of state and local child fatality review team records, § 68-142-108.

Confidentiality of statements filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, § 56-8-107.

Confidentiality of student health report cards, § 49-6-1401.

Confidentiality of student identification numbers for tracking students, § 49-6-5105.

Confidentiality of supreme court disciplinary enforcement proceedings, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 9, § 25.

Confidentiality of surrender information, § 36-1-116.

Confidentiality of tax returns and tax information, title 67, ch. 1, part 17.

Confidentiality of tax returns, tax information and tax administration information, § 67-1-1702.

Confidentiality of testimony, document and in investigation, § 56-6-120.

Confidentiality of testing of emergency workers exposed to airborne or bloodborne diseases, § 68-10-117.

Confidentiality of testing of law enforcement personnel, emergency personnel and employees of bureau of investigation exposed to hepatitis B or HIV virus, § 68-10-116.

Confidentiality of the identity and addresses of policyholders and certificate holders, § 56-6-404.

Confidentiality of trade secret information in compilation of water quantity data, § 69-7-305.

Confidentiality of victim impact statements, § 40-28-504.

Confidentiality of vital records, § 68-3-205.

Confidentiality of vocational rehabilitation records, § 49-11-613.

Confidentiality of witnesses at safety and health inspections, § 50-3-302.

Confidentiality of work injury records, § 50-3-702.

Confidentiality of writings, records or tangible objects obtained by attorney general, § 8-6-407.

Confidentiality of written agreement in the case of theft by minor, § 39-14-144.

Confidentiality of written examinations of commercial driver training schools, § 55-19-112.

Confidentiality on amount of charges for services to uninsured patients, § 68-11-262.

Confidentiality under Child Rape Protection Act of 2006, § 39-15-210.

Confidentiality under HIPAA, § 68-142-205.

Confidentiality under Medical Emergency Services Act of 1983, § 68-140-314.

Confidentiality under the Standard Valuation Law, § 56-1-917.

Confidentiality under the Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act, § 62-43-104.

Confidentiality where child adjudicated delinquent, § 37-1-131.

Consumer protection enforcement, confidentiality of information, § 47-18-106.

Contents of corporate governance disclosure, § 56-2-907.

Coordinator of elections, investigatory reports, confidentiality, § 2-11-202.

Criminal penalties under Check Cashing Act, § 45-18-119.

Deaf person's interpreter privilege, § 24-1-211.

Deferred compensation plans, government employees, confidentiality of records, § 8-25-109.

Denial of and procedures for obtaining access to public records, § 10-7-505.

Dental peer review committee proceedings, confidentiality, § 63-5-131.

Department of commerce and insurance summary of refusal of licensure as a reinsurance intermediary broker, § 56-6-803.

Department of economic and community development, confidentiality of proprietary information, §§ 4-3-712, 4-3-730.

Department of financial institutions, confidentiality of information, § 45-2-1603.

Department of human services, written reports, § 4-3-1205.

Dependent or neglected child, § 37-1-129.

Destruction or release of records, § 40-32-101.

Discharge or dismissal of charge by court-ordered probation, § 40-35-313.

Disclosure and use of confidential information to treasurer, see 66-29-178.

Disclosure of confidential information regarding local regulation of pesticides, § 43-8-114.

Disclosure of confidential information without consent, § 33-3-105.

Disclosure of information regarding shareholders in bank charter, § 45-2-303.

Disclosure of information relevant to enforcement of Tobacco Manufacturer's Escrow Fund Act, § 67-4-1028.

Disclosure of list of suppliers electing to remove petroleum products from out-of-state terminals, § 67-3-503.

Disclosure of nonpublic personal information, § 56-8-104.

Disclosure of patient information relating to outpatient treatment, § 33-6-601.

Disclosure of privileged or confidential information during probation of license of facility, § 68-11-207.

Disclosure to advocacy agency, disclosure to organization, § 33-3-106.

Disclosure to law enforcement agencies in cases of felony acts of bodily harm or sexual abuse, § 33-3-110.

Dissemination of social security numbers, § 4-4-125.

Divorce, confidentiality of communications during mediation proceedings, § 36-4-130.

Documents and evidence provided or obtained in investigations of fraudulent viatical settlement acts, § 56-50-114.

Documents disclosed to insurance commissioner pertaining to financial condition of insurer or health maintenance organization under Insurance Holding Company System Act of 1986, § 56-11-108.

Documents pertaining to criminal history background check of prospective employees of Tennessee Corrections Institute, § 41-7-109.

Documents relating to indigents' counsel, § 40-14-202.

Documents requested by community oversight board, § 38-8-312.

Documents submitted concerning review of proposed public benefit hospital conveyance transactions, § 48-68-210.

Domestic insurers, delinquency proceedings against, § 56-9-202.

Domestic violence shelters and rape crisis centers, confidentiality of records, § 36-3-623.

Drug-free workplace programs, confidentiality of records, § 50-9-109.

Drug testing subject to department of transportation procedures, § 50-9-107.

Duty of clerks of court with regard to confidential information, § 18-1-105.

Duty of department of energy to maintain confidentiality of proprietary information, § 4-3-712.

Duty of general sessions court clerk with regard to confidential records, § 16-15-303.

Duty of mental health provider or behavior analyst to predict, warn or take precautions to provide protection, § 33-3-206.

Duty of service provider responsible for transmitting or recording communications to communicate threat, § 33-3-208.

Electronic mail communications systems, confidentiality and monitoring, § 10-7-512

Employer workers' compensation insurance policies, § 50-6-421.

Employment security law enforcement, confidentiality, § 50-7-701.

Exception to discovery under Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, § 4-5-311.

Exception to open meetings provisions under State of Tennessee Audit Committee Act of 2005, § 4-35-108.

Exception to open records policy of department of economic and community development, § 4-3-730.

Exception to public inspection and copying of agency rules, final orders, and decisions, § 4-5-218.

Exceptions to openness provisions of Tennessee Education Lottery Implementation Law, § 4-51-124.

Excuse from jury service, confidentiality of documents submitted to show undue or extreme physical or financial hardship, § 22-1-103.

Exempt commercial risk policyholders, § 56-5-122.

Exemption for action by state agency required to be maintained as confidential, § 4-33-106.

Expungement of person's public records involving offenses related to status as victim of human trafficking, § 40-32-105.

Expunging records, § 40-32-101.

FastTrack grants and loans, § 4-3-717.

Fiduciary duty of members of LLC with regard to confidential information, § 48-240-102.

Filings relating to insurance companies’ scoring models and processes, § 56-5-205.

Financial information of counties applying for apportionment of sales and use tax revenue to commercial development districts in rural, economically distressed counties, § 67-6-104.

Financial practices, audits of licensees, and post-employment restrictions, § 4-51-310.

Fines and forfeitures, § 39-17-420.

Fiscal review committee’s information for health coverage bills, § 3-2-111.

Food stamp or food assistance recipients, confidentiality, § 71-5-304.

Foster care, confidentiality of records given to foster parents, § 37-2-415.
